Utah statutes.
11-25-11.   Comprehensive financing program ordinance -- Contents.

Prior to the issuance of any bonds or bond anticipation notes of the agency for residential rehabilitation, the agency shall by ordinance adopt a comprehensive residential rehabilitation financing program, including:

(1)  Criteria for selection of residential rehabilitation areas by the agency including findings by the agency that:

(a)  There are a substantial number of deteriorating structures in the area which do not conform to community standards for decent, safe, sanitary housing.

(b)  Financial assistance from the agency for residential rehabilitation is necessary to arrest the deterioration of the area.

(c)  Financing of residential rehabilitation in the area is economically feasible.  These findings are not required, however, when the residential rehabilitation area is located within the boundaries of a project area covered by an urban renewal project area plan adopted in accordance with Section 17C-2-107.

(2)  Procedures for selection of residential rehabilitation areas by the agency including:

(a)  Provisions for citizen participation in selection of residential rehabilitation areas.

(b)  Provisions for a public hearing by the agency prior to selection of any particular residential rehabilitation area.

(3)  A commitment that rehabilitation standards will be enforced on each residence for which financing is provided.

(4)  Guidelines for financing residential rehabilitation which shall be subject to the following limitations:

(a)  Outstanding loans on the property to be rehabilitated including the amount of the loans for rehabilitation, may not exceed 80% of the anticipated after-rehabilitation value of the property to be rehabilitated, except that the agency may authorize loans of up to 95% of the anticipated after-rehabilitation value of the property if loans are made for the purpose of rehabilitating the property for residential purposes, there is demonstrated need for such higher limit, and there is a high probability that the value of the property will not be impaired during the term of the loan.

(b)  The maximum repayment period for residential rehabilitation loans shall be 20 years or 3/4 of the economic life of the property, whichever is less.

(c)  The maximum amount loan for rehabilitation for each dwelling unit and for each commercial unit which is, or is part of a "residence" as defined in this chapter, shall be established by resolution of the agency.

